Arkansas, session 2025, HB1561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 16 - Research and Education Protection Act of 2025.

6-60-1601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Research and
Education Protection Act of 2025".

6-60-1602. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to protect Arkansas's research and
educational systems from the malign influence of foreign adversaries.

*CRH095*
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
6-60-1603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Affiliate organization” means an entity under the control
of or established for the benefit of an organization required to report
under this subchapter, including without limitation a direct-support
organization;
(2) “Agreement” means a written or spoken statement of mutual
interest in a cultural exchange agreement or an academic or a research
collaboration with a foreign adversary or an affiliate organization of a
foreign adversary;
(3) “Contract” means an agreement for the acquisition by
purchase, lease, or barter of property or services for the direct benefit
or use of either of the parties;
(4) "Cultural exchange agreement" means an agreement between a
foreign adversary and an institution of higher education that aims to
promote cultural and intellectual relations;
(5) “Direct-support organization” means an organization that is
organized and operated to receive, hold, invest, and administer property
and to make expenditures to or for the benefit of a:
(A) State-supported institution of higher education; or
(B) Research and development park or research and
development authority affiliated with a state-supported institution of
higher education;
(6) “Endeavor” means to attempt or to try;
(7) “Foreign adversary” means:
(A) The People’s Republic of China;
(B) The Russian Federation;
(C) The Islamic Republic of Iran;
(D) The Democratic People’s Republic of Korea;
(E) The Republic of Cuba;
(F) The Bolivarian Republic of Venezuela;
(G) The Syrian Arab Republic;
(H) A foreign terrorist organization designated by the
United States Secretary of State in accordance with section 219 of the
Immigration and Naturalization Act (INA), including without limitation an
agent of or other entity under significant control of the foreign
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
adversary; or
(I) An entity designated by the United States Government;
(8) “Foreign agent” means an officer, employee, proxy, servant,
delegate, or representative of a foreign government;
(9)(A) “Foreign government” means the government of a country,
nation, or group of nations or a province or other political subdivision
of a country or nation other than the United States.
(B) "Foreign government" includes without limitation an
agent of the government of a country, nation, or group of nations or a
province or other political subdivision of a country or nation other than
the United States;
(10) “Foreign instrumentality” means an agency, bureau,
ministry, component, institution, association, or any legal, commercial,
or business organization, corporation, firm, or entity that is
substantially owned, controlled, sponsored, commanded, managed, or
dominated by a foreign government;
(11)(A) “Gift” means:
(i) A gift;
(ii) An endowment;
(iii) An award;
(iv) A donation of money or property of any kind; or
(v) Any combination of subdivisions (11)(A)(i)—(iv)
of this section.
(B) "Gift" includes without limitation a conditional or
unconditional pledge of the gift, endowment, award, or donation.
(C) For purposes of subdivision (11)(B) of this section,
“pledge” means a promise, an agreement, or an expressed intention to give
a gift;
(12) “Institution of higher education” means:
(A) A state-supported institution of higher education or
an independent nonprofit college or university that is located in and
charted by the state and grants baccalaureate or higher degrees;
(B) Any other institution of higher education that has a
physical presence in the state and is required to report foreign gifts or
contracts pursuant to 20 U.S.C. §1011f; or
(C) An affiliate organization of an institution of higher
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
education;
(13) “Obtain or use” means any manner of:
(A) Taking or exercising control over property;
(B) Making any unauthorized use, disposition, or transfer
of property;
(C) Obtaining property by fraud, willful misrepresentation
of a future act, or false promise; or
(D) Conduct previously known as:
(i) Stealing;
(ii) Larceny;
(iii) Purloining;
(iv) Abstracting;
(v) Embezzlement;
(vi) Misapplication;
(vii) Misappropriation;
(viii) Conversion;
(ix) Obtaining money or property by false pretenses,
fraud, or deception; or
(x) Other conduct similar in nature;
(14) “Partnership” means a:
(A) Faculty or student exchange program;
(B) Study abroad program;
(C) Matriculation program;
(D) Recruiting program; or
(E) Dual degree program;
(15) “Person” means:
(A) Any natural person;
(B) A corporation;
(C) A business trust;
(D) An estate;
(E) A trust;
(F) A partnership;
(G) An association;
(H) A joint venture;
(I) A government;
(J) A governmental subdivision or agency; or
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
(K) Any other legal or commercial entity;
(16) "Research" means a scientific investigation or development
that involves technologies, designs, or technical data considered
sensitive enough to potentially impact national security, and therefore
requires strict controls on the export or transfer to foreign entities, as
outlined by the International Traffic in Arms Regulations and the Export
Administration regulations of the United States Government; and
(17) “Trade secret” means information, including a formula,
pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process,
that:
(i) Derives independent economic value, actual or
potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily
ascertainable by proper means by, other persons who can obtain economic
value from its disclosure or use; and
(ii) Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under
the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

6-60-1604. Disclosure requirements for past gifts.
(a)(1) An institution of higher education that has received directly
or indirectly a gift with a value equal to or greater than two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from a foreign adversary after December
31, 2019, shall disclose the gift.
(2) The disclosure of a gift required under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section shall be made to the governing board of the institution of
higher education within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this
subchapter.
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under state or
federal law, the disclosure required under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall include without limitation the:
(1) Date of the gift;
(2) Amount of the gift;
(3) Purpose of the gift;
(4) Identification of the person for whom the gift is explicitly
intended to benefit;
(5) Applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms
made part of the gift;
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
(6) Name and country of residence or domicile of the foreign
adversary;
(7) Name and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and
(8) Date of termination of the gift, as applicable.
(c) An institution of higher education shall maintain a public website
to disclose information on past gifts from a foreign adversary.
(d) For purposes of this section, a gift received from a foreign
adversary through an intermediary or affiliate organization, if known, is:
(1) An indirect gift to the institution of higher education; and
(2) Subject to the disclosure process described in this section.
(e) Upon a request of the Governor, the President of the Senate, or
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the governing board of an
institution of higher education shall inspect or audit a past gift or gift
agreement.

6-60-1605. Approval requirements for future gifts.
(a) An institution of higher education that has been offered directly
or indirectly a gift with a value equal to or greater than two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from a foreign adversary after the
effective date of this subchapter shall disclose the proposed gift to the
governing board of the institution of higher education.
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under state or
federal law, the disclosure required under subsection (a) of this section
shall include without limitation the:
(1) Date of the gift;
(2) Amount of the gift;
(3) Purpose of the gift;
(4) Identification of the person for whom the gift is explicitly
intended to benefit;
(5) Applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms
made part of the gift;
(6) Name and country of residence or domicile of the foreign
adversary;
(7) Name and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and
(8) Date of termination of the gift, as applicable.
(c)(1) Within thirty (30) days of receiving the disclosure of the
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
proposed gift under subsection (a) of this section, the governing board of
an institution of higher education shall issue a final decision to the
institution of higher education on whether and under what conditions the
institution of higher education may accept the gift.
(2) The governing board of the institution of higher education
shall reject a gift from a foreign adversary unless there is an
overwhelming state or national interest in accepting the gift.
(d)(1) The governing board of an institution of higher education shall
develop:
(A) A disclosure form;
(B) Rules; and
(C) Procedures for deciding whether to allow an
institution of higher education to accept a gift from a foreign adversary.
(2) A gift from a foreign adversary shall only be accepted if
the gift addresses an overwhelming state or national interest beyond
simply acquiring additional funds.
(e) An institution of higher education shall maintain a public website
to disclose information on accepted gifts from foreign adversaries.
(f) For purposes of this section, a gift received from a foreign
adversary through an intermediary shall be considered an indirect gift
with the institution of higher education and is subject to the approval
process described in this section.
(g) Upon a request of the Governor, the President of the Senate, or
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the governing board of an
institution of higher education shall inspect or audit a gift or gift
agreement.

6-60-1606. Disclosure requirements for past contracts.
(a) An institution of higher education that has entered directly or
indirectly into a contract with a value equal to or greater than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) with a foreign adversary after
December 31, 2019, shall disclose the contract to the governing board of
the institution of higher education within sixty (60) days following the
effective date of this subchapter.
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under state or
federal law, the disclosure required under subsection (a) of this section
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
shall include without limitation:
(1) The date of the contract;
(2) The amount of the contract;
(3) The purpose of the contract;
(4) The identification of the person for whom the contract is
explicitly intended to benefit;
(5) The applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or
terms made part of the contract;
(6) A copy of the contract;
(7) The name and country of residence or domicile of the foreign
adversary;
(8) The name and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and
(9) The date of termination of the contract, as applicable.
(c) For purposes of this section, a contract entered with a foreign
adversary through an intermediary or affiliate organization shall be
considered an indirect contract to the institution of higher education and
is subject to the disclosure process described in this section.
(d) An institution of higher education shall maintain a public website
to disclose information on contracts with a foreign adversary.
(e) Upon the request of the Governor, the President of the Senate, or
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the governing board of an
institution of higher education shall inspect or audit a past contract.

6-60-1607. Approval requirements for future contracts.
(a) An institution of higher education that has been offered or has
proposed directly or indirectly a contract with a value equal to or
greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) from or with a
foreign adversary after the effective date of this subchapter shall
disclose the proposed contract to the governing board of the institution
of higher education before entering into the contract.
(b) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential under state or
federal law, the disclosure required under subsection (a) of this section
shall include without limitation:
(1) The date of the contract;
(2) The amount of the contract;
(3) The purpose of the contract;
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
(4) The identification of the person for whom the contract is
explicitly intended to benefit;
(5) The applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or
terms made part of the contract;
(6) A copy of the contract;
(7) The name and country of residence or domicile of the foreign
adversary;
(8) The name and mailing address of the disclosing entity; and
(9) The date of termination of the contract as applicable.
(c)(1) Within thirty (30) days of receiving the disclosure of the
proposed contract under subsection (a) of this section, the governing
board of an institution of higher education shall issue a final decision
to the institution of higher education on whether and under what
conditions the institution of higher education may enter into the
contract.
(2) The governing board of the institution of higher education
shall reject a contract with a foreign adversary unless there is an
overwhelming state or national interest in accepting or entering the
contract.
(d)(1) The governing board of an institution of higher education shall
develop disclosure forms, rules, and procedures for deciding upon whether
to allow institutions of higher education to enter into contracts from
foreign adversaries.
(2) A contract shall only be entered into if the contract
addresses an overwhelming state or national interest.
(e) An institution of higher education shall maintain a public website
disclosing a contract from a foreign adversary described in this section,
along with the final decision on whether to allow the relevant institution
of higher education to enter into the contract.
(f) For purposes of this section, a contract proposed from a foreign
adversary through an intermediary or affiliate organization shall be
considered an indirect contract with the institution of higher education
and is subject to the approval process described in this section.
(g) An institution of higher education shall maintain a public website
to disclose information on contracts from foreign adversaries.
(h) Upon a request of the Governor, the President of the Senate, or
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the governing board of an
institution of higher education shall inspect or audit a contract
agreement.

6-60-1608. Enforcement related to foreign gifts — Penalties — Rewards.
(a) Upon receiving a referral from a compliance officer of an
institution of higher education or a sworn complaint based upon
substantive information and reasonable belief as defined in Arkansas law,
the Department of Inspector General shall investigate an allegation of a
violation of §§ 6-60-1605 — 6-60-1607.
(b)(1) The department or compliance officer authorized by an
institution of higher education may request records relevant to any
reasonable suspicion of a violation of this subchapter.
(2) An entity shall provide the requested records under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section within ten (10) days after the request
or a later date agreed to by the department.
(c) An institution of higher education that knowingly fails to make a
disclosure required under this subchapter or knowingly fails to provide
records requested under subsection (b)(1) of this section is subject to,
upon a final administration finding, a civil fine of:
(1) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a first violation; or
(2) Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for a subsequent
violation.
(d) A whistleblower who reports an undisclosed foreign gift or
contract from a foreign adversary to the appropriate inspector general may
also report the undisclosed gift or contract to the Attorney General and
retain whistleblower protection under the Arkansas Whistle-Blower Act, §
21-1-601 et seq.
(e) Information reported under subsection (b) of this section is not
confidential or exempt from examination or disclosure, except as otherwise
provided by law.
(f) The governing board an institution of higher education and the
department may adopt rules to implement this section.

6-60-1609. Prohibition on certain cultural exchange agreements.
(a) An institution of higher education shall not participate in a
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
cultural exchange agreement with a foreign adversary or an entity
controlled by a foreign adversary unless the institution of higher
education:
(1) Addresses an overwhelmingly underaddressed state or national
need; and
(2) Avoids:
(A) Constraining the freedom of contract of the public
entity;
(B) Allowing the curricula or values of a program in the
state to be directed, controlled, or influenced by the foreign adversary;
or
(C) Promoting an agenda detrimental to the safety or
security of the state, residents of the state, or the United States.
(b)(1) Before the execution of a cultural exchange agreement with a
foreign adversary, the substance of the cultural exchange agreement shall
be shared with the Department of the Inspector General.
(2) If the department concludes that the cultural exchange
agreement promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety or security of the
state, the United States, or residents of the state, the institution of
higher education shall not enter into the cultural exchange agreement.
(c)(1) By December 1, 2026, and each December 1 thereafter, the
governing board of an institution of higher education and the department
shall submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives relating to
partnerships and agreements of institutions of higher education made with
educational institutions or other institutions based in foreign
adversaries.
(2) At a minimum, the report required by subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall include without limitation the following information
for the previous fiscal year:
(A) Data reflecting any program, agreement, partnership,
or contract between an institution of higher education and any college,
university, or entity that is based in or controlled by a foreign
adversary;
(B) Data reflecting any office, campus, or physical
location used or maintained by an institution of higher education in a
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
foreign adversary; and
(C) The date on which any such program, agreement,
partnership, or contract reported pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(A) is
expected to terminate.
(d) Each institution of higher education shall submit the information
required in subsection (c) of this section to the governing board of the
institution of higher education and the department by July 1, 2026, and on
each July 1 thereafter.
(e)(1) A registered student organization or scholar association hosted
by an institution of higher education shall not:
(A) Accept a gift from a foreign adversary;
(B) Enter into any contract or agreement with a foreign
adversary; or
(C) Be directed or controlled by the government of a
foreign adversary.
(2) A violation of subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall
result in the institution of higher education ending any affiliation with
the registered student organization.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, member dues or fees shall
not be considered a gift from or a contract or agreement with a foreign
adversary.
(f) The governing board of an institution of higher education and the
department shall adopt rules to administer this section.

6-60-1610. Screening requirements for higher education hiring and
research.
(a) An institution of higher education or affiliate of an institution
of higher education that has federal research expenditures of ten million
dollars ($10,000,000) or more shall screen applicants who are citizens of
a foreign adversary and are not permanent residents of the United States
prior to any final offer of employment or letter of invitation as follows:
(1) Employment in:
(A) Research positions; and
(B) Graduate and undergraduate students applying for
research positions; or
(2) A position of a visiting researcher who is a citizen of a
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
foreign adversary and is not a permanent resident of the United States.
(b)(1) The screening required by subsection (a) of this section is
required before offering the applicant a position of employment or of a
visiting researcher.
(2) At the discretion of the institution of higher education,
other applicants for a position may be screened.
(c) An applicant described in subsection (a) of this section shall
submit:
(1) A complete resume or curriculum vitae, including without
limitation every institution of higher education attended;
(2) All previous employment since the applicant’s eighteenth
birthday;
(3) A list of all published material for which the applicant
received credit as an author, a researcher, or otherwise to which the
applicant contributed significant research, writing, or editorial support;
(4) A list of the applicant’s current and pending research
funding from any source, including the name of the funder, amount,
applicant’s role on the project, and brief description of the research;
(5) A full disclosure of non-university professional activities,
including any affiliation with an institution or program in a foreign
adversary;
(6) Other activities that bear on the qualifications appropriate
for the position, including without limitation private or public sector
experience, military service, or other appropriate experience; and
(7) A list of all patents held and the country of record.
(d) For an applicant who has been continually employed or enrolled in
an institution of higher education in the United States for twenty (20)
years or more, the resume may include employment history before the most
recent twenty (20) years.
(e)(1) The president or chief administrative officer of the
institution of higher education or affiliate of the institution of higher
education shall designate a research compliance office to review all
materials required in subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The president or chief administrator of the institution of
higher education shall take reasonable steps to verify information that
includes without limitation:
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
(A) Searching public listings of persons subject to
sanctions or restrictions under federal law;
(B) Submitting the applicant’s name and other identifying
information to any federal agency reasonably willing to scrutinize the
applicant for national security or counterespionage purposes; and
(C) Any other steps deemed appropriate to the research
compliance office under subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(3) The institution of higher education or affiliate of the
institution of higher education may also create a process to approve
applicants for hire based on a risk-based determination considering the:
(A) Nature of the research; and
(B) Background and ongoing affiliations of the applicant.
(f)(1) The requirements of this section shall be completed before
offering any position to an individual described in subsection (a) in any
research position and before granting the individual any access to
research data or activities or other sensitive data.
(2) An applicant screened under this section shall not be
employed in any research position if he or she fails to disclose a
substantial educational, employment, or research activity, publication, or
presentation at the time of submitting an application, unless the academic
department head or his or her designee certifies in writing the substance
of the nondisclosure and the reasons for disregarding the failure to
disclose.

6-60-1611. Foreign adversary travel requirements.
(a)(1) By January 1, 2026, each institution of higher education or
affiliate organization of the institution of higher education that has
federal research expenditures of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or more
shall establish a foreign adversary travel approval and monitoring
program.
(2) The foreign adversary travel approval and monitoring program
required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall require
preapproval and screening by a research compliance office designated by
the president or chief administrative officer of the institution of higher
education or affiliate organization of the institution of higher education
for any employment-related foreign travel to a foreign adversary country
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
and employment-related foreign adversary activities engaged in by all
faculty, researchers, and research department staff.
(3) The requirement under subdivision (a)(2) of this section
shall be in addition to any other travel approval process applicable to
the state-supported institution of higher education or affiliate
organization.
(b) Preapproval for travel to a foreign adversary country by the
research compliance office of the institution of higher education shall be
based on:
(1) The applicant’s review and acknowledgement of guidance
published by the employing state-supported institution of higher education
or affiliate organization of the institution of higher education that
relates to:
(A) Foreign adversaries;
(B) Countries under sanction; or
(C) Other restrictions or designations imposed by the
state or the United States Government including without limitation:
(i) Any federal licensing requirements;
(ii) Customs rules;
(iii) Export controls;
(iv) Restrictions on taking university or entity
property, including intellectual property, abroad;
(v) Restrictions on presentations, teaching, and
interactions with foreign adversary colleagues; and
(vi) Other subjects important to the research and
academic integrity of the institution of higher education; and
(2) The binding commitment of the individual traveler not to
violate the institution of higher education or affiliate organization of
the institution of higher education’s limitations on foreign adversary
travel and activities abroad and to obey all applicable federal laws.
(c)(1) The institution of higher education or affiliate organization
of the institution of higher education shall maintain records of:
(A) All foreign adversary travel requests and approvals;
(B) Expenses reimbursed by the institution of higher
education or affiliate organization of the institution of higher education
during such foreign adversary travel including for travel, food, and
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
lodging; and
(C) Payments and honoraria received during the foreign
adversary travel and activities, including for travel, food, and lodging.
(2)(A) The institution of higher education shall also keep
records of the purpose of the foreign adversary travel and any records
related to the foreign activity review.
(B) The records shall be retained for at least three (3)
years or any longer period of time required by any other applicable state
or federal law.
(d) The institution of higher education shall provide an annual report
to the governing board of the institution of higher education of foreign
travel to a foreign adversary country listing the:
(1) Individual traveler;
(2) Foreign adversary location visited; and
(3) Foreign adversary institution visited.

6-60-1612. Prohibitions on research partnerships.
(a)(1) An institution of higher education shall only enter into a new
partnership or renew an existing partnership with a foreign
instrumentality if the institution of higher education maintains
sufficient structural safeguards to protect the intellectual property of
the institution of higher education.
(2) The governing board of an institution of higher education
shall notify an institution of higher education if the board determines
the partnership meets the safeguard requirements required by this
subsection.
(3) The safeguard requirements under this subsection shall
include without limitation the following:
(A) Compliance with all federal requirements, including
the requirements of federal research sponsors and federal export control
agencies, including regulations regarding international traffic in arms
and export administration regulations, and economic and trade sanctions
administered by the federal office of foreign assets control;
(B) Annual formal institution-level programs for faculty
on conflicts of interest and conflicts of commitment;
(C) An overwhelming state interest to enter into the
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
research or academic partnership;
(D) Lack of alternative institutions to engage with for a
similar research or academic partnership; and
(E) A formalized foreign visitor process and uniform
visiting scholar agreement.
(b) The board shall have full discretion to reject or terminate any
research partnership between an institution of higher education and an
academic or research institution located in a foreign adversary at any
time and for any purpose.

6-60-1613. Prohibitions related to trade secrets.
A person who engages in willful misappropriation of a trade secret with
the intent to benefit a foreign government, a foreign agent, or a foreign
instrumentality shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a Class D felony.

6-60-1614. Penalties for violations related to intellectual property.
(a) A person who violates § 6-60-1613 commits theft of a trade secret
and is guilty of a Class D felony.
(b) A person who traffics in, or endeavors to traffic in, a trade
secret that he or she knows or should know was obtained or used without
authorization commits trafficking in a trade secret and is guilty of a
Class D felony.
(c) Whenever a person is charged with a violation of this act which
was committed with the intent to benefit a foreign government, a foreign
agent, or a foreign instrumentality, the offense for which the person is
charged shall be reclassified as follows:
(1) In the case of theft of a trade secret, from a Class D
felony to a Class C felony; and
(2) In the case of trafficking in trade secrets, from a Class D
felony to a Class C felony.

6-60-1615. Duties related to foreign adversary software — Rules.
(a) The governing board of an institution of higher education shall
conduct a thorough review of all software and software platforms used by
an institution of higher education that may be linked to foreign
adversaries.
03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 H3/12/25 HB1561
(b) The board shall:
(1) Develop a plan to eliminate the usage of software and
software platforms hosted, operated, or owned by foreign adversary
countries; and
(2) Adopt policies that prohibit the future utilizing or
contracting with entities domiciled in, or controlled or owned by
companies or other entities domiciled in foreign adversary countries that
host, operate, or own software and software platforms.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are
declared severable.

/s/Painter



















03-12-2025 10:56:59 CRH095